Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-648
Birth defects; reports.

Birth defects and allied diseases shall be reported by physicians, hospitals, and persons in attendance at births in the manner and on such forms as may be prescribed by the department. Such reports may be included in the monthly report to the department on births as required by section 71-610. Such reports shall be forwarded to the department no later than the tenth day of the succeeding month after the birth. When objection is made by either parent to furnishing information relating to the medical and health condition of a live-born child because of conflict with religion, such information shall not be required to be entered as provided in this section.

Laws 1972, LB 1203, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 60;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 66;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 549;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 447.

Medically handicapped child, report of birth, see section 71-1405.